Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-3608
Commitment; voluntary hospitalization or treatment.

No person having communicable tuberculosis who in his or her home or elsewhere obeys the rules, regulations, and orders of the department for the control of tuberculosis or who voluntarily accepts hospitalization or treatment in a health care facility which is licensed and approved for such use under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act by the department, or other location as approved by the Governor, and obeys the rules, regulations, and orders of the department for the control of communicable tuberculosis shall be committed under the Tuberculosis Detection and Prevention Act.

Laws 1963, c. 399, § 8, p. 1276;

Laws 1972, LB 1492, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 660;

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 108;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 91;

Laws 2024, LB1215, § 34.

Health Care Facility Licensure Act, see section 71-401.